HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY оаниітврсулдкмпяьзчбегхшжєйїцюфщґОАНИІТВРСУЛДКМПЯЬЗЧБЕГХШЖЄЙЇЦЮФЩҐ-'
MAP 1
MAP гґ
WORDCHARS -ʼ'`
BREAK 1
BREAK -
IGNORE ́
NOSUGGEST !
ICONV 64
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ’ '
ICONV a 0
ICONV b 0
ICONV c 0
ICONV d 0
ICONV e 0
ICONV f 0
ICONV g 0
ICONV h 0
ICONV i 0
ICONV j 0
ICONV k 0
ICONV l 0
ICONV m 0
ICONV n 0
ICONV o 0
ICONV p 0
ICONV q 0
ICONV r 0
ICONV s 0
ICONV t 0
ICONV u 0
ICONV v 0
ICONV x 0
ICONV w 0
ICONV y 0
ICONV z 0
ICONV A 0
ICONV B 0
ICONV C 0
ICONV D 0
ICONV E 0
ICONV F 0
ICONV G 0
ICONV H 0
ICONV I 0
ICONV J 0
ICONV K 0
ICONV L 0
ICONV M 0
ICONV N 0
ICONV O 0
ICONV P 0
ICONV Q 0
ICONV R 0
ICONV S 0
ICONV T 0
ICONV U 0
ICONV V 0
ICONV X 0
ICONV W 0
ICONV Y 0
ICONV Z 0
ICONV é 0
ICONV ô 0
ICONV ï 0
ICONV ü 0
ICONV ç 0
ICONV ñ 0
ICONV ß 0
ICONV ë 0
ICONV ä 0
ICONV ö 0
REP 11
REP сч щ
REP керуюч керівн
REP бажаюч охоч
REP числи налічува
REP уюч увальн
REP ююч ювальн
REP ємн містк
REP обез зне
REP а$ у
REP відображ показ
REP відобража відбива
SFX V Y 92
SFX V ий ого [^ц]ий 
SFX V ий ому [^ц]ий 
SFX V ий им ий 
SFX V ий ім ий 
SFX V ий а [^ц]ий 
SFX V ий ої [^ц]ий 
SFX V ий ій ий 
SFX V ий у [^ц]ий 
SFX V ий ою [^ц]ий 
SFX V ий е ий 
SFX V ий і ий 
SFX V ий их ий 
SFX V ий ими ий 
SFX V е ого е 
SFX V е ому е 
SFX V е им е 
SFX V ий ього лиций 
SFX V ий ьому лиций 
SFX V ий я лиций 
SFX V ий ьої лиций 
SFX V ий ю лиций 
SFX V ий ьою лиций 
SFX V ий ого [^л]иций 
SFX V ий ому [^л]иций 
SFX V ий а [^л]иций 
SFX V ий ої [^л]иций 
SFX V ий у [^л]иций 
SFX V ий ою [^л]иций 
SFX V ий ого [^и]ций 
SFX V ий ому [^и]ций 
SFX V ий а [^и]ций 
SFX V ий ої [^и]ций 
SFX V ий у [^и]ций 
SFX V ий ою [^и]ций 
SFX V ій ього ій 
SFX V ій ьому ій 
SFX V ій ім ій 
SFX V ій я ій 
SFX V ій ьої ій 
SFX V ій ю ій 
SFX V ій ьою ій 
SFX V ій є ій 
SFX V й 0 [їі]й 
SFX V й х [їі]й 
SFX V й ми [їі]й 
SFX V їй його їй 
SFX V їй йому їй 
SFX V їй їм їй 
SFX V їй я їй 
SFX V їй йої їй 
SFX V їй ю їй 
SFX V їй йою їй 
SFX V їй є їй 
SFX V 0 ого [їи]н 
SFX V 0 ому [їи]н 
SFX V 0 им [їи]н 
SFX V 0 ім [їи]н 
SFX V 0 а [їи]н 
SFX V 0 ої [їи]н 
SFX V 0 ій [їи]н 
SFX V 0 у [їи]н 
SFX V 0 ою [їи]н 
SFX V 0 е [їи]н 
SFX V 0 і [їи]н 
SFX V 0 их [їи]н 
SFX V 0 ими [їи]н 
SFX V ів ового ів 
SFX V ів овому ів 
SFX V ів овим ів 
SFX V ів овім ів 
SFX V ів ова ів 
SFX V ів ової ів 
SFX V ів овій ів 
SFX V ів ову ів 
SFX V ів овою ів 
SFX V ів ове ів 
SFX V ів ові ів 
SFX V ів ових ів 
SFX V ів овими ів 
SFX V їв євого їв 
SFX V їв євому їв 
SFX V їв євим їв 
SFX V їв євім їв 
SFX V їв єва їв 
SFX V їв євої їв 
SFX V їв євій їв 
SFX V їв єву їв 
SFX V їв євою їв 
SFX V їв єве їв 
SFX V їв єві їв 
SFX V їв євих їв 
SFX V їв євими їв 
SFX U Y 33
SFX U ів евого ів 
SFX U ів евому ів 
SFX U ів евим ів 
SFX U ів евім ів 
SFX U ів ева ів 
SFX U ів евої ів 
SFX U ів евій ів 
SFX U ів еву ів 
SFX U ів евою ів 
SFX U ів еве ів 
SFX U ів еві ів 
SFX U ів евих ів 
SFX U ів евими ів 
SFX U в ва [оеє]в 
SFX U в ву [оеє]в 
SFX U в вим [оеє]в 
SFX U в ві [оеє]в 
SFX U в вої [оеє]в 
SFX U в вій [оеє]в 
SFX U в вою [оеє]в 
SFX U ін іна ін 
SFX U ін іну ін 
SFX U ін іним ін 
SFX U ін іні ін 
SFX U ін іної ін 
SFX U ін іній ін 
SFX U ін іною ін 
SFX U в ви [оеє]в 
SFX U в вих [оеє]в 
SFX U в вими [оеє]в 
SFX U ін іни ін 
SFX U ін іних ін 
SFX U ін іними ін 
SFX W Y 4
SFX W ий о [^жчшщ]ий 
SFX W ій ьо ій 
SFX W їй йо їй 
SFX W ти но ти 
SFX 0 Y 5
SFX 0 увати овано [^ж]увати 
SFX 0 увати ено жувати 
SFX 0 ювати ьовано ювати 
SFX 0 ити жено [^з]дити 
SFX 0 ити ено [жщ]ити 
