HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
абонувати/ABGHOP0
абордувати/ABOP0
абортувати/ABOP0
Абрамов/U
абсолютизувати/ABOP0
абсорбувати/ABOP0
абстрагувати/ABGHOP0
Авдєєв/U
автентифікувати/ABGHOP0
автогазозаправний/V
автоматизувати/ABOP0
Агєєв/U
агресивний/VW
агрометеорологічний/V
азотно-калійний/V
Айтматов/U
Акімов/U
алгебричний/VW
Алексєєв/U
алкалоїдний/VZ
Алфєєв/U
Алханов/U
ананьївський/V
анархічний/VW
Андрєєв/U
Андропов/U
антиєвропейський/V
антипатичний/VW
Антипов/U
антологічний/V
Арбузов/U
Ареф'єв/U
ароматний/VWZ
арсенатний/V
Артем'єв/U
архівувати/ABOP0
асоційований/VW
Астаф'єв/U
Атамбаєв/U
атлантичний/V
Афанасьєв/U
Ахмедов/U
Бабаєв/U
Бабкін/U
Бабушкін/U
багатовимірний/VW
багатоводний/V
багатопалий/V
багатополюсний/VW
багатощелепний/V
Бадоєв/U
Баженов/U
базисний/VW
Бакієв/U
Бакулін/U
Балабанов/U
Балаганов/U
Балакірєв/U
баловий/V
Банников/U
Барабашов/U
Баренців/U
Басаєв/U
батований/V
Бахарєв/U
безальтернативний/VW
безвихідний/VW
безвітрий/V
безвічний/VW
бездарний/VW
безжалісливий/VW
беззмістовний/VW
беззнаковий/V
безконфліктний/VW
безмитний/VW
безнаглядний/VW
безодрадний/VW
безперешкодний/VW
безправний/VW
безприсудковий/V
безпросвітний/VW
безсистемний/VW
безступінчастий/VW
безтільний/V
безугавний/VW
безхребетний/VW
Бекмамбетов/U
Бердимухамедов/U
Бердяєв/U
бережений/V
Бехтерєв/U
Бистряков/U
бідненький/VW
білий/V
біомагнітний/V
блаженний/VW
блідолистий/V
блокувати/ABGHOP0
Богатирьов/U
Боголюбов/U
Богомолов/U
Болдирєв/U
болісний/VW
болісніший/VY
Борисов/U
Бочкарьов/U
бракувальний/V
Брежнєв/U
Бризгалов/U
Бронников/U
брудний/VW
Бубнов/U
бубонний/V
Булавін/U
Булганін/U
Бунін/U
бурсацький/V
Бутурлін/U
буферизувати/ABGHOP0
вабний/VW
Вавілов/U
важковідновлювальний/V
вантажопіднімальний/V
Варламов/U
васальний/VW
Васнецов/U
Вахтангов/U
вдалий/VWZ
вдумливий/VW
великотоварний/V
вентральний/VW
Вернидубов/U
вершковий/V
взірцевий/VW
вивантажувальний/V
виведений/VW
вигнаний/VW
видержаний/VW
видраний/V
виїжджений/VW
викривальний/VW
викручений/V
виморений/VW
Виноградов/U
винятковий/VW
виписаний/VW
Вирипаєв/U
виритий/VW
вирішуваний/V
вислуханий/VW
висококваліфікований/VW
високотехнічний/VW
вистежений/V
витиснутий/VW
вихолощений/VW
вичерпаний/V
вияснений/VW
відгалужений/V
відділений/VW
відкопаний/VW
відьмачий/V
відмінений/VW
відповідний/VWZ
відрослий/VW
відставлений/V
відтермінувати/A0
відформатувати/AB0
військово-технічний/V
вікіфікувати/ABGHOP0
віртуозний/VW
віяловий/V
Власов/U
внутрішньоспілковий/V
вогкуватий/VW
волгоградський/V
Волков/U
Волокітін/U
Воронін/U
Воропаєв/U
вощаний/V
всунутий/V
всякий/VW
вусатий/V
Гаврилов/U
Гадюкін/U
Газманов/U
газофазовий/V
Галкін/U
Гарін/U
гармонічний/VW
гарячеоцинкований/V
геопатогенний/V
Георгієв/U
гідросиловий/V
гладкожерловий/V
Глазьєв/U
глобальний/VW
говірний/V
Голованов/U
Голубєв/U
Горбачов/U
гордуватий/V
Горюнов/U
готівковий/V
граматичний/VW
Гребешков/U
Гризлов/U
гринвіцький/V
гумовий/V
Гундяєв/U
Давидов/U
давньоукраїнський/V
даремний/VWZ
двогострий/V
двотактовий/V
декламаційний/VW
декодувати/ABGHOP0
Дементьєв/U
демонічний/VW
Дергачов/U
державно-правовий/V
Джемільов/U
джутовий/V
динамічний/VW
дисонансовий/V
дірчавий/V
добросовісний/VWZ
довженний/V
Долгополов/U
дольодовиковий/V
домальований/VW
дородовий/V
доцентровий/VW
Драгоманов/U
драгоманський/V
дубовий/V
Дуров/U
єгипетський/V
Єгоров/U
екзистенційний/VW
експоненціальний/VW
електрифікований/VW
електропідігріваний/V
Ємельянов/U
емулювати/ABGHOP0
енергомісткий/V
Єрмолаєв/U
Єрохін/U
етнічно-культурний/V
Єфимов/U
жалісний/VW
Жарков/U
жерстяно-штампувальний/V
жовтодзьобий/V
Жуков/U
забобонний/VW
забовванілий/V
завужений/V
загаданий/VW
загальнотеоретичний/V
загримований/VW
загрузлий/VW
задушевний/VW
зазубний/V
заколисаний/VW
закрадливий/V
залізобетонний/VW
замазувальний/V
зам'ятий/VW
занотувати/A0
заобрійний/V
запечений/VW
заповітніший/VY
заржавілий/VW
засалений/V
застиглий/VW
застудний/V
зафарбований/VW
Захаров/U
захисний/V
збитий/VW
збіганий/V
звіриний/VW
звукозаписний/V
здоровий/VWZ
з'єднуваний/V
злидарський/V
зловтішний/VW
знадливий/V
значний/VWZ
зневадити/A0
знівелювати/A0
золотисто-каштановий/V
Золотухін/U
зотлілий/VW
зрусифікувати/AB0
Зуєв/U
Ігнатов/U
ієрогліфічний/VW
ізюбровий/V
Ілюмжинов/U
імплантувати/AB0
імплементувати/AB0
ініціалізувати/ABOP0
інкасований/VW
інформаційний/V
істотний/VWZ
Каверін/U
Калінін/U
калькувати/ABGHOP0
калошний/V
канонізувати/AB0
Капранов/U
Карасьов/U
Карімов/U
Карпов/U
Касьянов/U
категоризований/VW
катувати/ABOP0
качиний/V
кваліфікувати/ABGHOP0
кешувати/ABGHOP0
Ківалов/U
Кірсанов/U
клаповухий/V
Клюєв/U
Кожемякін/U
Колобов/U
колонізований/VW
командний/VW
Конєв/U
конфіденційний/VW
концентраційний/V
Копелєв/U
Коровін/U
Корчагін/U
Костомаров/U
краплинний/V
красивий/VWZ
Кривоногов/U
Крюков/U
кубковий/V
Кудрявцев/U
Куйбишев/U
Купріянов/U
Кутузов/U
ладний/VW
ластовиний/V
Лебедєв/U
Лєсков/U
ліловий/V
лінчований/VW
Ліхачов/U
Лукашов/U
людиноненависницький/V
Ляхов/U
Малахов/U
малоймовірний/VW
малостійкий/V
Мальцев/U
Мамонов/U
Масляков/U
масштабувати/ABOP0
Машков/U
межовий/V
Меньшиков/U
мерехтливий/VW
Мечников/U
Михайлов/U
міжкістковий/V
мінімізований/VW
Міхалков/U
модерувати/ABGHOP0
модифікований/VW
Молчанов/U
монополізований/VW
мулярський/V
Муратов/U
Набоков/U
набридливий/VW
надводний/V
наділений/VW
наклепницький/V
накошений/VW
напівопозиційний/V
напівсерйозний/VW
настійливий/VW
наступальний/VW
нашатирний/VW
небрикетований/V
неврастенічний/VW
негомінкий/V
незаскиртований/V
нейтралізувати/AB0
Некрасов/U
немейський/V
немодний/VW
непілотований/V
нервовий/VW
нерозораний/V
нефрогенний/V
Нечаєв/U
Нікулін/U
новоселицький/V
ностальгійний/VW
обернутий/VW
облесливий/V
обмотаний/VW
обтяжливий/VWZ
обшальований/V
огороджувати/AB0
однойменний/VW
оздоблювальний/V
окультурений/VW
Олександров/U
оптичний/VW
оптово-відпускний/V
Османов/U
остиглий/VW
охайніший/VY
оцифрувати/AB0
очний/VW
Папанов/U
парламентсько-урядовий/V
Парфьонов/U
патогенний/VW
пераметризувати/ABOP0
перегороджений/VW
перезавантажити/ABCDOP0
перекомпілювати/AB0
перекомутувати/A0
перекроєний/VW
переносний/VW
перепланований/VW
перетворений/VW
переформатувати/AB0
перський/V
підбадьорливий/VW
підданський/V
підмитий/VW
підстережений/V
підтриманий/VW
плачучий/V
Плеханов/U
плямистий/VW
Поваляєв/U
повсюдний/VW
поглинальний/V
поєднаний/VW
покірливий/VWZ
покований/V
Поляков/U
померлий/VW
понабріхуваний/V
понищити/A0
поперемінний/VW
попришиваний/V
Портников/U
портувати/AB0
посаджений/VW
поступальний/VW
посудомлений/V
похнюплений/VW
предивний/VW
предметний/VW
приватизований/VW
приємний/VWZ
прикрий/VW
принадний/VW
присуджений/VW
притоптаний/VW
пробуджений/VW
продублювати/AB0
прожитий/VW
прозорливий/VW
проініціалізувати/AB0
проникливий/VWZ
простимульований/V
просторовий/VW
прошитий/VW
псевдоготичний/V
Пуговкін/U
радикальний/VW
Разумков/U
райкомівський/V
Рахманов/U
рекомендований/VW
репрезентативний/V
Рижков/U
рівночасний/VW
рожевокрилий/V
розархівувати/AB0
розворушений/VW
роз'єднаний/VW
розлитий/VW
розмашистий/VW
розписаний/VW
розстріляний/VW
розчленований/VW
Романов/U
романтичний/VW
Сабуров/U
самовпевнений/VW
Самойлов/U
сановитий/VW
себелюбний/V
Селезньов/U
серійний/VW
симпатичніший/VY
Сіньков/U
сіяний/VW
складніший/VY
сконфігурувати/AB0
скоректований/VW
слізливий/VW
смертенний/V
Соловйов/U
сонний/VW
спектрозональний/V
сповіщений/VW
сприятливий/VWZ
стадний/V
стереотипний/VW
Столипін/U
стоянковий/V
страшненький/VW
субтитрувати/ABGH0
сумовитий/VW
сумчастий/V
Суслов/U
сфальшувати/A0
тавтологічний/VW
тарханкутський/V
Тедеєв/U
термінологічний/VW
тигрячий/V
Тихонов/U
Толмачов/U
тонкий/VW
точнісінький/V
Третьяков/U
тріумфальний/VW
троїстий/V
Тухманов/U
угвинчений/VW
ужалений/V
улагоджений/VW
упорядкований/VWZ
упроваджений/VW
Усманов/U
устромлений/VW
утвердити/AB0
утилізувати/ABGH0
уявлений/VW
Фадєєв/U
фантастичніший/VY
Фетисов/U
Філіппов/U
фільтрувати/ABGHOP0
фінансовий/VW
форматувати/ABOP0
фосфоричний/VW
Фурманов/U
хвилеподібний/VW
ховрашковий/V
Хостікоєв/U
художній/VW
Циганков/U
ціджений/V
Ченцов/U
червонястий/VW
Черняков/U
чиновницький/V
Чистяков/U
Шаляпін/U
швидкоплинний/VW
швидкорозчинний/V
Шевцов/U
Шестаков/U
штировий/V
щодобовий/VW
Юсупов/U
якнайясніший/V
